apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="ча/стый__adj">
      <e><p>          <l>стого</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стый</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стого</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стому</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стым</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стом</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стый</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стая</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стую</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стой</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стой</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стой</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стой</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стое</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стое</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стого</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стому</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стым</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стом</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стых</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стые</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стых</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стым</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стыми</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стых</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>стые</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ще</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <!--<e><p>          <l>ще+по</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>-->
      <e><p>          <l>ст</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ста</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>сто</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>сты</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сто</l><r>стый<s n="adj"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="нем/ой__adj">
      <e><p>          <l>ого</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ой</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ого</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ому</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ым</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ом</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ой</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ая</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ую</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ой</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ой</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ой</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ой</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ое</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ое</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ого</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ому</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ым</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ом</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ых</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ые</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ых</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ым</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ыми</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ых</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="an"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ые</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>а</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>о</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ы</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="short"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>о</l><r>ой<s n="adj"/><s n="cmp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="немой"><i>нем</i><par n="нем/ой__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="частый"><i>ча</i><par n="ча/стый__adj"/></e>
